Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-197
Department of Correctional Services; records to be kept.

The Board of Parole shall have the power to direct the Director of Correctional Services to keep records concerning committed offenders which the board deems pertinent to its functions.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 28, p. 3087.